Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 111. Mississippi Small Business and Existing Forestry Industry Enterprise Participating Loan Program

§ 57-111-1.
Establishment of program of loans to small businesses and existing forestry industry enterprises; purpose of program; amount of loan; interest rate; use of loan proceeds; Small Business and Existing Forestry Industry Enterprise Participating Loan Program Revolving Fund created.

As used in this section:

“MDA” means the Mississippi Development Authority.

“Program” means the Mississippi Small Business and Existing Forestry Industry Enterprise Participating Loan Program established in this section.

“Small business” means any commercial enterprise with less than one hundred (100) full-time employees, less than Seven Million Dollars ($7,000,000.00) in gross revenues or less than Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($750,000.00) in net annual profit after taxes.

“Existing forestry industry enterprise” means a manufacturing enterprise that:

Has its principal place of business in this state;

Has been operating in this state for not less than three (3) consecutive years preceding the date of submitting an application for assistance under this section;

Performs the initial processing of pine logs and/or hardwood logs in the production of lumber products or is engaged in the production of poles and/or timbers; and

Has employed an average of not less than fifteen (15) employees based on the most recent thirty-six-month period preceding the date that the enterprise submits an application for assistance under this section.

The term “existing forestry industry enterprise” does not include any (a) enterprise with the primary business of producing chips or (b) pulp manufacturer and/or paper manufacturer.

The MDA shall establish a program of loans to be made to small businesses and existing forestry industry enterprises for the purpose of encouraging the extension of conventional financing and the issuance of letters of credit to small businesses and existing forestry industry enterprises by private institutions. Money to make the loans under the program shall be drawn by the MDA from the Small Business Participating Loan Program Revolving Fund. The amount of a loan to any single small business or existing forestry industry enterprise under the program shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the total cost of the project for which financing is sought. Interest shall be charged on the loans at a rate equal to one percent (1%) above the current published prime rate. The term of any loan made under this section shall not exceed five (5) years. Repayments of loans made by the MDA under the program shall be deposited to the credit of the Small Business and Existing Forestry Industry Enterprise Participating Loan Program Revolving Fund. Small businesses may utilize loan proceeds for buildings, equipment and working capital. An existing forestry industry enterprise that receives a loan under this section may use the loan proceeds for the purpose of providing working capital, acquiring machinery and equipment, making upgrades and improvements to machinery and equipment, acquiring raw materials and any other purposes approved by the MDA.

There is created a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the Small Business and Existing Forestry Industry Enterprise Participating Loan Program Revolving Fund which shall consist of money from any source designated for deposit into the fund. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Money in the fund shall be disbursed by the Mississippi Development Authority for the purposes authorized in subsection (2) of this section.

Money in the fund that is derived from the proceeds of general obligation bonds may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the MDA for the administration of the various grant, loan and financial incentive programs administered by the MDA. An accounting of actual costs incurred for which reimbursement is sought shall be maintained by the MDA. Reimbursement of reasonable actual and necessary costs shall not exceed three percent (3%) of the proceeds of bonds issued. Reimbursements made under this subsection shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 2010); Laws, 2019, ch. 453, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2019.